Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. Teachers in General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

School district rules limiting distribution of literature or other communications among public school teachers as violative of first amendment, 65 ALR Fed 209.

§ 21-7-301.
Insurance and other fringe and employment benefits.

The board of trustees of each school district within the state may provide health insurance, life insurance, and other fringe and employment benefits of all types for the teachers, administrative personnel and other employees of the school district to such extent as it deems such benefits to be in the best interest of the school district. Benefits under this subsection may be paid for entirely by the school district or partly by the school district and partly by the employee, the degree of participation of each being entirely within the discretion of the board of trustees. Benefits under this subsection may be in addition to any benefits obtained through the group insurance plan if elected by the school district under W.S. 9-3-201(e).

The board of trustees of each school district which is a participating district in the state employees’ and officials’ group insurance plan, as defined under W.S. 9-3-203(a)(xvi), shall provide insurance under the group plan for the teachers, administrative personnel and other employees meeting the definition of employee under W.S. 9-3-203(a)(iv), as provided by W.S.

9-3-202

through

9-3-218

. Each participating school district shall report to the department of administration and information as specified by W.S. 9-3-205(e) and make payments for employer and employee contributions as provided by W.S.

9-3-210

and

9-3-211

. The amount of contributions paid under W.S.

9-3-211

for each employee electing coverage shall be deducted from the employee’s monthly salary in accordance with W.S. 9-3-211.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-159.1, 21-159.2; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 172; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-172; 2010, ch. 106, § 1; 2014 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to liability insurance for teachers, see §

21-3-128

.

The 2010 amendment,

in (a), substituted “Benefits under this subsection” for “Such benefits,” and added the present last sentence; and added (b).

Laws 2010, ch. 106, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2010.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2005, ch. 121, § 2, directs that, prior to reevaluation of the education resource block grant model during the 2005 interim period preceding the 2006 budget session of the legislature, as required under W.S. 21-13-309(t), additional funding is to be provided to assist school districts with the expenses of health insurance coverage for district employees during school year 2005-2006. See Laws 2005, ch. 121, § 2, for specifics as to computation and distribution. Laws 2005, ch. 121, § 3(c), appropriates $33,321,419 for the period commencing April 1, 2005, and ending June 30, 2006, from amounts within the school foundation program account for this purpose.

Laws 2005, ch. 121, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the first sentence of (b), substituted “W.S. 9-3-203(a)(xvi)” for “W.S. 9-3-203(a)(xv)”.

Cited

in

In re Seyfang, 563 P.2d 1376,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1977).

§ 21-7-302.
Discrimination in compensation prohibited.

No discrimination in the amount of compensation for the teachers in the public schools of this state shall be made on account of sex, race or religious belief.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 103, § 62; R.S. 1887, § 3971; Laws 1890-91, ch. 21, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 614; C.S. 1910, § 1965; C.S. 1920, § 2271; R.S. 1931, § 99-343; C.S. 1945, § 67-136; W.S. 1957, § 21-35; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 173; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-173.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 USC § 1681 et seq.) to sex discrimination in educational employment, 54 ALR Fed 522.

What constitutes religious harassment in employment in violation of Title VII of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. §§ 2000e et seq.), 149 ALR Fed 405.

What constitutes reverse or majority race or national origin discrimination violative of federal constitution or statutes — nonemployment cases 152 ALR Fed 1.

Sex discrimination in public education under Title IX — Supreme Court cases, 158 ALR Fed 563.

§ 21-7-303.
Certificate or permit required; exception.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), (c) or (d) of this section, no person shall teach or supervise in a public school in this state and receive compensation therefor out of any public fund who at the time of rendering such services is not a holder of or a candidate and qualified for a certificate or permit issued or to be issued under the laws of this state and the rules and regulations of the Wyoming professional teaching standards board pursuant to W.S.

21-2-802

.

Faculty members employed, even if for less than a calendar year, by any postsecondary education institution accredited by a regional accrediting agency may teach courses offered at a public high school in this state without holding or being qualified for a certificate or permit issued by the Wyoming professional teaching standards board and without meeting the requirements of W.S.

21-7-304

as provided in this subsection. A person teaching at a public school pursuant to this subsection shall teach only if the course is within the same subject area in which he instructs at the accredited postsecondary institution and:

The course provides academic credit for both high school graduation requirements and postsecondary education requirements; or

The course provides only academic credit for high school graduation requirements and there is no other certified and qualified teacher teaching at that school available to teach the course.

In accordance with the provisions of this subsection, a person may teach driver education in a public school in this state without holding or being qualified for a certificate or permit issued by the Wyoming professional teaching standards board and without meeting the requirements of W.S.

21-7-304

. The Wyoming professional teaching standards board shall by rule establish and maintain minimum standards for a permit for that employment which shall be applicable only as provided in this subsection. A person employed by a school district to teach driver education in a public school in this state, shall not be employed for more than three (3) consecutive school years in any period beginning after July 1, 1997, unless the person has met the requirements of the professional teaching standards board for a permit to teach driver education.

A person may be employed as superintendent of schools by any district board of trustees without holding or being qualified for certification by the Wyoming professional teaching standards board pursuant to W.S.

21-2-802

. A person who has not qualified for certification pursuant to W.S.

21-2-802

shall be required to comply with W.S. 21-2-802(e) prior to being employed by any district board as a superintendent of schools.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 33, § 8; C.S. 1910, § 2020; R.S. 1931, § 99-130; C.S. 1945, § 67-135; W.S. 1957, § 21-33; Laws 1967, ch. 142, § 1; 1969, ch. 111, § 174; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-174; 1993, ch. 217, § 2; 1997, ch. 66, § 1; ch. 194, § 1; 2001, ch. 107, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to powers and duties of state board with respect to certificates, see §§

21-2-304

,

21-2-305

and notes thereto.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1997, ch. 66, § 2(a), provides: “Each district shall evaluate the performance of the persons teaching under W.S. 21-7-303(b) in accordance with the district teacher performance evaluation program adopted pursuant to W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xviii).”

Payment to a teacher who has no certificate is unauthorized.

Sorenson v. School Dist., 418 P.2d 1004,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1966).

Superintendents not teachers for tenure purposes. —

While school superintendents are considered “certified professional employees” for hiring purposes, superintendents are not teachers for tenure purposes. Seyfang v. Board of Trustees, 563 P.2d 1376,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1977).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Tests of moral character or fitness as requisite to issuance of teacher's license or certificate, 96 ALR2d 536.

Sexual conduct as ground for dismissal of teacher or denial or revocation of teaching certificate, 78 ALR3d 19.

§ 21-7-304.
Candidate for certificate must pass examination on state and federal constitutions.

All persons hereafter applying for certificates authorizing them to become administrators or teachers in the public schools of this state shall before receiving such certificate be required to pass a satisfactory examination upon the provisions and principles of the constitutions of the United States and the state of Wyoming or present evidence of having successfully completed a course equivalent to that required in W.S.

21-9-102

.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 94, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 99-142; C.S. 1945, § 67-1408; W.S. 1957, § 21-260; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 175; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-175.

Cited

in

In re Seyfang, 563 P.2d 1376,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 253

(Wyo. 1977).